Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-508
State Fire Marshal; arson; investigations; evidence.

The State Fire Marshal shall, when in his opinion further investigation is necessary, take or cause to be taken the testimony on oath of all persons supposed to be cognizant of any facts or to have any means of knowledge in relation to the matter as to which an examination is herein required to be made, and shall cause the same to be reduced to writing. If he shall be of the opinion that there is evidence sufficient to charge any person with the crime of arson, he shall file complaint with the county attorney, who shall cause such person to be arrested and charged with such offense. The fire marshal shall furnish to the proper prosecuting attorney all such evidence, together with a copy of all names of all witnesses and all the information obtained by him, including a copy of all pertinent and material testimony taken in the case; and shall keep a record of the proceedings and progress made in all such prosecutions for arson and the result of all cases finally disposed of.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 7, p. 481;

C.S.1929, § 81-5507;

R.S.1943, § 81-508.

It is statutory duty of fire marshal to investigate the cause, origin and circumstances of every fire. McHugh v. Ridgell, 105 Neb. 212, 180 N.W. 75 (1920).